Florida, session 2026, SB948.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 39 40 Section 1.âSection 125.022, Florida Statutes, is amended to 41 read: 42 125.022âDevelopment permits and orders.â 43 (1)âAs used in this section, the terms âdevelopment permitâ 44 and âdevelopment orderâ have the same meanings as in s. 45 163.3164, but do not include building permits. 46 (2)(1)âA county shall specify in writing the minimum 47 information that must be submitted in an application for a 48 zoning approval, rezoning approval, subdivision approval, 49 certification, special exception, or variance. A county shall 50 make the minimum information available for inspection and 51 copying at the location where the county receives applications 52 for development permits and orders, provide the information to 53 the applicant at a preapplication meeting, or post the 54 information on the countyâs website. 55 (3)âA county shall follow the application procedures 56 established in s. 163.3254(6) upon receiving an application for 57 approval of a development permit or development order. 58 (2) Within 5 business days after receiving an application 59 for approval of a development permit or development order, a 60 county shall confirm receipt of the application using contact 61 information provided by the applicant. Within 30 days after 62 receiving an application for approval of a development permit or 63 development order, a county must review the application for 64 completeness and issue a written notification to the applicant 65 indicating that all required information is submitted or specify 66 in writing with particularity any areas that are deficient. If 67 the application is deficient, the applicant has 30 days to 68 address the deficiencies by submitting the required additional 69 information. For applications that do not require final action 70 through a quasi-judicial hearing or a public hearing, the county 71 must approve, approve with conditions, or deny the application 72 for a development permit or development order within 120 days 73 after the county has deemed the application complete. For 74 applications that require final action through a quasi-judicial 75 hearing or a public hearing, the county must approve, approve 76 with conditions, or deny the application for a development 77 permit or development order within 180 days after the county has 78 deemed the application complete. Both parties may agree in 79 writing or in a public meeting or hearing to an extension of 80 time, particularly in the event of a force majeure or other 81 extraordinary circumstance. An approval, approval with 82 conditions, or denial of the application for a development 83 permit or development order must include written findings 84 supporting the countyâs decision. The timeframes contained in 85 this subsection do not apply in an area of critical state 86 concern, as designated in s. 380.0552. The timeframes contained 87 in this subsection restart if an applicant makes a substantive 88 change to the application. As used in this subsection, the term 89 âsubstantive changeâ means an applicant-initiated change of 15 90 percent or more in the proposed density, intensity, or square 91 footage of a parcel. 92 (3)(a)âWhen reviewing an application for a development 93 permit or development order that is certified by a professional 94 listed in s. 403.0877, a county may not request additional 95 information from the applicant more than three times, unless the 96 applicant waives the limitation in writing. 97 (b)âIf a county makes a request for additional information 98 and the applicant submits the required additional information 99 within 30 days after receiving the request, the county must 100 review the application for completeness and issue a letter 101 indicating that all required information has been submitted or 102 specify with particularity any areas that are deficient within 103 30 days after receiving the additional information. 104 (c)âIf a county makes a second request for additional 105 information and the applicant submits the required additional 106 information within 30 days after receiving the request, the 107 county must review the application for completeness and issue a 108 letter indicating that all required information has been 109 submitted or specify with particularity any areas that are 110 deficient within 10 days after receiving the additional 111 information. 112 (d)âBefore a third request for additional information, the 113 applicant must be offered a meeting to attempt to resolve 114 outstanding issues. If a county makes a third request for 115 additional information and the applicant submits the required 116 additional information within 30 days after receiving the 117 request, the county must deem the application complete within 10 118 days after receiving the additional information or proceed to 119 process the application for approval or denial unless the 120 applicant waived the countyâs limitation in writing as described 121 in paragraph (a). 122 (e)âExcept as provided in subsection (7), if the applicant 123 believes the request for additional information is not 124 authorized by ordinance, rule, statute, or other legal 125 authority, the county, at the applicantâs request, shall proceed 126 to process the application for approval or denial. 127 (4)âA county must issue a refund to an applicant equal to: 128 (a)âTen percent of the application fee if the county fails 129 to issue written notification of completeness or written 130 specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days after 131 receiving the application. 132 (b)âTen percent of the application fee if the county fails 133 to issue a written notification of completeness or written 134 specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days after 135 receiving the additional information pursuant to paragraph 136 (3)(b). 137 (c)âTwenty percent of the application fee if the county 138 fails to issue a written notification of completeness or written 139 specification of areas of deficiency within 10 days after 140 receiving the additional information pursuant to paragraph 141 (3)(c). 142 (d)âFifty percent of the application fee if the county 143 fails to approve, approves with conditions, or denies the 144 application within 30 days after conclusion of the 120-day or 145 180-day timeframe specified in subsection (2). 146 (e)âOne hundred percent of the application fee if the 147 county fails to approve, approves with conditions, or denies an 148 application 31 days or more after conclusion of the 120-day or 149 180-day timeframe specified in subsection (2). 150 A county is not required to issue a refund if the applicant and 151 the county agree to an extension of time, the delay is caused by 152 the applicant, or the delay is attributable to a force majeure 153 or other extraordinary circumstance. 154 (4)(5)âWhen a county denies an application for a 155 development permit or development order, the county shall give 156 written notice to the applicant. The notice must include a 157 citation to the applicable portions of an ordinance, rule, 158 statute, or other legal authority for the denial of the permit 159 or order. 160 (6)âAs used in this section, the terms âdevelopment permitâ 161 and âdevelopment orderâ have the same meaning as in s. 163.3164, 162 but do not include building permits. 163 (5)(7)âFor any development permit application filed with 164 the county after July 1, 2012, a county may not require as a 165 condition of processing or issuing a development permit or 166 development order that an applicant obtain a permit or approval 167 from any state or federal agency unless the agency has issued a 168 final agency action that denies the federal or state permit 169 before the county action on the local development permit. 170 (6)(8)âIssuance of a development permit or development 171 order by a county does not in any way create any rights on the 172 part of the applicant to obtain a permit from a state or federal 173 agency and does not create any liability on the part of the 174 county for issuance of the permit if the applicant fails to 175 obtain requisite approvals or fulfill the obligations imposed by 176 a state or federal agency or undertakes actions that result in a 177 violation of state or federal law. A county shall attach such a 178 disclaimer to the issuance of a development permit and shall 179 include a permit condition that all other applicable state or 180 federal permits be obtained before commencement of the 181 development. 182 (7)(9)âThis section does not prohibit a county from 183 providing information to an applicant regarding what other state 184 or federal permits may apply. 185 Section 2.âSection 166.033, Florida Statutes, is amended to 186 read: 187 166.033âDevelopment permits and orders.â 188 (1)âAs used in this section, the terms âdevelopment permitâ 189 and âdevelopment orderâ have the same meanings as in s. 190 163.3164, but do not include building permits. 191 (2)(1)âA municipality shall specify in writing the minimum 192 information that must be submitted for an application for a 193 zoning approval, rezoning approval, subdivision approval, 194 certification, special exception, or variance. A municipality 195 shall make the minimum information available for inspection and 196 copying at the location where the municipality receives 197 applications for development permits and orders, provide the 198 information to the applicant at a preapplication meeting, or 199 post the information on the municipalityâs website. 200 (3)âA municipality shall follow the application procedures 201 established in s. 163.3254(6) upon receiving an application for 202 approval of a development permit or development order. 203 (2)âWithin 5 business days after receiving an application 204 for approval of a development permit or development order, a 205 municipality shall confirm receipt of the application using 206 contact information provided by the applicant. Within 30 days 207 after receiving an application for approval of a development 208 permit or development order, a municipality must review the 209 application for completeness and issue a written notification to 210 the applicant indicating that all required information is 211 submitted or specify in writing with particularity any areas 212 that are deficient. If the application is deficient, the 213 applicant has 30 days to address the deficiencies by submitting 214 the required additional information. For applications that do 215 not require final action through a quasi-judicial hearing or a 216 public hearing, the municipality must approve, approve with 217 conditions, or deny the application for a development permit or 218 development order within 120 days after the municipality has 219 deemed the application complete. For applications that require 220 final action through a quasi-judicial hearing or a public 221 hearing, the municipality must approve, approve with conditions, 222 or deny the application for a development permit or development 223 order within 180 days after the municipality has deemed the 224 application complete. Both parties may agree in writing or in a 225 public meeting or hearing to an extension of time, particularly 226 in the event of a force majeure or other extraordinary 227 circumstance. An approval, approval with conditions, or denial 228 of the application for a development permit or development order 229 must include written findings supporting the municipalityâs 230 decision. The timeframes contained in this subsection do not 231 apply in an area of critical state concern, as designated in s. 232 380.0552 or chapter 28-36, Florida Administrative Code. The 233 timeframes contained in this subsection restart if an applicant 234 makes a substantive change to the application. As used in this 235 subsection, the term âsubstantive changeâ means an applicant 236 initiated change of 15 percent or more in the proposed density, 237 intensity, or square footage of a parcel. 238 (3)(a)âWhen reviewing an application for a development 239 permit or development order that is certified by a professional 240 listed in s. 403.0877, a municipality may not request additional 241 information from the applicant more than three times, unless the 242 applicant waives the limitation in writing. 243 (b)âIf a municipality makes a request for additional 244 information and the applicant submits the required additional 245 information within 30 days after receiving the request, the 246 municipality must review the application for completeness and 247 issue a letter indicating that all required information has been 248 submitted or specify with particularity any areas that are 249 deficient within 30 days after receiving the additional 250 information. 251 (c)âIf a municipality makes a second request for additional 252 information and the applicant submits the required additional 253 information within 30 days after receiving the request, the 254 municipality must review the application for completeness and 255 issue a letter indicating that all required information has been 256 submitted or specify with particularity any areas that are 257 deficient within 10 days after receiving the additional 258 information. 259 (d)âBefore a third request for additional information, the 260 applicant must be offered a meeting to attempt to resolve 261 outstanding issues. If a municipality makes a third request for 262 additional information and the applicant submits the required 263 additional information within 30 days after receiving the 264 request, the municipality must deem the application complete 265 within 10 days after receiving the additional information or 266 proceed to process the application for approval or denial unless 267 the applicant waived the municipalityâs limitation in writing as 268 described in paragraph (a). 269 (e)âExcept as provided in subsection (7), if the applicant 270 believes the request for additional information is not 271 authorized by ordinance, rule, statute, or other legal 272 authority, the municipality, at the applicantâs request, shall 273 proceed to process the application for approval or denial. 274 (4)âA municipality must issue a refund to an applicant 275 equal to: 276 (a)âTen percent of the application fee if the municipality 277 fails to issue written notification of completeness or written 278 specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days after 279 receiving the application. 280 (b)âTen percent of the application fee if the municipality 281 fails to issue written notification of completeness or written 282 specification of areas of deficiency within 30 days after 283 receiving the additional information pursuant to paragraph 284 (3)(b). 285 (c)âTwenty percent of the application fee if the 286 municipality fails to issue written notification of completeness 287 or written specification of areas of deficiency within 10 days 288 after receiving the additional information pursuant to paragraph 289 (3)(c). 290 (d)âFifty percent of the application fee if the 291 municipality fails to approve, approves with conditions, or 292 denies the application within 30 days after conclusion of the 293 120-day or 180-day timeframe specified in subsection (2). 294 (e)âOne hundred percent of the application fee if the 295 municipality fails to approve, approves with conditions, or 296 denies an application 31 days or more after conclusion of the 297 120-day or 180-day timeframe specified in subsection (2). 298 299 A municipality is not required to issue a refund if the 300 applicant and the municipality agree to an extension of time, 301 the delay is caused by the applicant, or the delay is 302 attributable to a force majeure or other extraordinary 303 circumstance. 304 (4)(5)âWhen a municipality denies an application for a 305 development permit or development order, the municipality shall 306 give written notice to the applicant. The notice must include a 307 citation to the applicable portions of an ordinance, rule, 308 statute, or other legal authority for the denial of the permit 309 or order. 310 (6)âAs used in this section, the terms âdevelopment permitâ 311 and âdevelopment orderâ have the same meaning as in s. 163.3164, 312 but do not include building permits. 313 (5)(7)âFor any development permit application filed with 314 the municipality after July 1, 2012, a municipality may not 315 require as a condition of processing or issuing a development 316 permit or development order that an applicant obtain a permit or 317 approval from any state or federal agency unless the agency has 318 issued a final agency action that denies the federal or state 319 permit before the municipal action on the local development 320 permit. 321 (6)(8)âIssuance of a development permit or development 322 order by a municipality does not create any right on the part of 323 an applicant to obtain a permit from a state or federal agency 324 and does not create any liability on the part of the 325 municipality for issuance of the permit if the applicant fails 326 to obtain requisite approvals or fulfill the obligations imposed 327 by a state or federal agency or undertakes actions that result 328 in a violation of state or federal law. A municipality shall 329 attach such a disclaimer to the issuance of development permits 330 and shall include a permit condition that all other applicable 331 state or federal permits be obtained before commencement of the 332 development. 333 (7)(9)âThis section does not prohibit a municipality from 334 providing information to an applicant regarding what other state 335 or federal permits may apply. 336 Section 3.âSection 163.3254, Florida Statutes, is created 337 to read: 338 163.3254âFlorida Starter Homes Act.âThe Florida Starter 339 Homes Act is created to address the rising price of homes in 340 this state and increase the supply of housing for the residents 341 of this state. 342 (1)âThis section may be cited as the âFlorida Starter Homes 343 Act.â 344 (2)âThe Legislature finds that: 345 (a)âThe median price of homes in this state has increased 346 steadily over the last decade, rising at a greater rate of 347 increase than the median income in this state. 348 (b)âThe cost of home ownership and renting or leasing often 349 exceeds an amount that is affordable for residents of this 350 state. 351 (c)âThere is currently a housing shortage that constitutes 352 a threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the residents of 353 this state, and this shortage is caused in part by land 354 development regulations adopted by local governments without a 355 compelling governmental interest relating to lots on residential 356 real property, which substantially burden the basic right under 357 the State Constitution to acquire, possess, and protect 358 property. 359 (d)âLand development regulations adopted relating to lots 360 on residential real property do not encourage a high degree of 361 flexibility relating to residential development, and such 362 regulations prevent the development of single-family homes on 363 lots smaller in size, due, in part, to minimum lot size 364 requirements and restrictions on the types of dwellings allowed 365 to be constructed on such property. 366 (e)âThe public purpose sought to be achieved by allowing 367 other types of dwelling units on lots smaller in size on 368 residential real property is to increase the supply of housing, 369 making homeownership and renting more affordable for the 370 residents of this state. 371 (3)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 372 (a)ââCompelling governmental interestâ means a governmental 373 interest of the highest order which cannot be achieved through 374 less restrictive means. A compelling governmental interest must 375 have a real and substantial connection to protecting public 376 safety, health, or reasonable enjoyments and expectations of 377 property, such as requiring the structural integrity, safe 378 plumbing, or safe electricity of buildings, or preventing 379 nuisances. 380 (b)ââLand development regulationsâ has the same meaning as 381 in s. 163.3164. 382 (c)ââLocal governmentâ means any county, municipality, or 383 special district. 384 (d)ââLot splitâ means the division of a parent parcel into 385 no more than eight lots. 386 (e)ââParent parcelâ means the original parcel from which 387 subsequent lots are created. 388 (f)ââResidential dwelling unitâ means a structure or part 389 of a structure used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by 390 at least one person. The term includes a single-family home, a 391 townhouse as defined in s. 481.203, and a duplex, triplex, or 392 quadruplex, and their curtilage. 393 (g)ââShared spaceâ means a driveway, an alley, or a common 394 open space, such as a courtyard or pocket park. 395 (h)ââSubdivisionâ means the division of a parent parcel 396 into nine or more lots. The term includes streets, alleys, 397 additions, and resubdivisions. 398 (4)(a)1.âA local government may not adopt land development 399 regulations that govern lots on residential real property, 400 unless such adoption: 401 a.âIs in furtherance of a compelling governmental interest. 402 b.âIs the least restrictive means of furthering that 403 compelling governmental interest. 404 2.âSubparagraph 1. does not apply to land development 405 regulations that: 406 a.âPrevent or abate a nuisance. 407 b.âEnforce the terms of a license, a permit, or an 408 authorization. 409 c.âEnforce any requirement imposed by federal law. 410 d.âIs the result of a final, nonappealable judicial 411 determination. 412 3.âAny ambiguity in the adoption of land development 413 regulations by a local government must be construed in favor of 414 the basic right to acquire and possess land. 415 (b)âIf a lot on residential real property is connected to a 416 public water system or a public sewer system, or will be 417 connected to such a system as part of a subdivision plan, a 418 local government may not adopt land development regulations 419 that: 420 1.âRequire a minimum lot size that is greater than 1,200 421 square feet for an existing lot and for lots created by a lot 422 split or subdivision. 423 2.âContain a provision defining a residential dwelling unit 424 that is contrary to the definition in subsection (3). 425 3.âProhibit, limit, or otherwise restrict the development 426 of residential dwelling units. 427 4.âRequire a minimum setback that is greater than: 0 feet 428 from the sides; 10 feet from the rear; or 20 feet from the 429 front, or 0 feet from the front if the lot fronts or abuts a 430 shared space. 431 5.âRequire a minimum dimension of a lot, including its 432 width or depth, to exceed 20 feet if the lot meets the relevant 433 minimum lot size requirement. 434 6.âRequire more than 30 percent of lot area to be reserved 435 for open space or permeable surface. 436 7.âRequire a maximum building height of less than three 437 stories or 35 feet above grade or, if applicable, three stories 438 or 35 feet above the base flood elevation established by the 439 Federal Emergency Management Agency. 440 8.âRequire a maximum floor area ratio of less than 3. 441 9.âRequire the property owner to occupy the property. 442 10.âRequire a minimum size for a residential dwelling unit 443 that is greater than the minimum size imposed by the Florida 444 Building Code. 445 11.âRequire a maximum residential density, typically 446 measured in dwelling units per acre, which is more restrictive 447 than the requirements of this subsection. 448 (5)(a)1.âLand development regulations adopted by a local 449 government must allow a lot to front or abut a shared space 450 instead of a public right-of-way. However, such regulations may 451 not be adopted to require a minimum number of parking spaces 452 greater than one per residential dwelling unit for lots that are 453 4,000 square feet or less, or any minimum number of parking 454 spaces for lots within a one-half mile radius of a permanent 455 public transit stop that is open for public use on or after July 456 1, 2026. 457 2.âAs used in subparagraph 1., the term âpublic transit 458 stopâ means a stop or station used for public purposes for 459 transit services, including bus rapid transit services or 460 commuter rail services, an intercity rail transportation system, 461 or a rail system, as defined in s. 341.301. The term does not 462 include people-mover systems in a public-use airport as defined 463 by s. 332.004. 464 (b)âLand development regulations adopted by a local 465 government which establish criteria for the application for, or 466 approval of, the proposed development of a lot split are limited 467 to the following: 468 1.âThe requirement that an applicant provide the relevant 469 documentation and pay a fee for the cost of review of such 470 documentation. Any other fee imposed on the application for, or 471 approval of, a lot split is prohibited. 472 2.âRequired compliance with the local governmentâs land 473 development regulations that govern lots not created by a lot 474 split. 475 3.âThe requirement that the parent parcel was not created 476 by a lot split or subdivision during the previous 12 months. 477 (6)(a)âUpon receipt of a development application, a local 478 government shall confirm receipt of the application by the next 479 business day using the contact information provided by the 480 applicant. Within 7 business days after receiving an 481 application, a local government shall review the application for 482 completeness and issue a written notification to the applicant 483 indicating that all required information is submitted or specify 484 in writing with particularity any areas that are deficient. If 485 the application is deficient, the applicant has 60 business days 486 to address the deficiencies by submitting the required 487 additional information. Within 7 business days after receipt of 488 such information, a local government shall issue a written 489 notification to the applicant indicating that all required 490 information is submitted or specify in writing with 491 particularity any areas that are deficient. A local government 492 shall administratively approve an application within 20 business 493 days after the local government has deemed the application 494 complete and no further action or approval by the local 495 government is required. Any denial of the application must 496 include written findings supporting the local governmentâs 497 decision. At any point during the timeframes specified in this 498 subsection, an applicant may request, and a local government 499 must grant, an extension of time for up to 60 business days. 500 However, a local government may not request an extension of time 501 or require an applicant to request an extension of time. 502 (b)âIf a local government fails to: 503 1.âIssue a written notification of completeness or written 504 specification of areas of deficiency within the first 7 505 business-day time period provided in paragraph (a); 506 2.âIssue a written notification of completeness or written 507 specification of areas of deficiency within the second 7 508 business-day time period provided in paragraph (a); or 509 3.âApprove an application within the 20-business-day time 510 period contained in paragraph (a), 511 512 the application is deemed approved, and the local government 513 must issue written notification of approval by the next business 514 day. 515 (c)âA local government must issue a refund to an applicant 516 equal to 100 percent of the application fee if the local 517 government fails to issue written notification of completeness 518 or written specification of areas of deficiency within 7 519 business days after receiving the additional information 520 pursuant to paragraph (a). 521 (7)(a)âLand development regulations adopted by a local 522 government which govern lot splits on historic property as 523 defined in s. 267.021 may not vary from land development 524 regulations adopted governing historic property without such lot 525 splits. 526 (b)âParagraph (a) does not apply to land development 527 regulations adopted to prohibit the demolition or alteration of 528 a structure or building that is individually listed in the 529 National Register of Historic Places, or that is a contributing 530 structure or building within a historic district which was 531 listed in the National Register of Historic Places before 532 January 1, 2000. 533 (8)(a)âA real property owner or housing association subject 534 to land development regulations adopted by a local government in 535 violation of this section may maintain a cause of action for 536 damages in the county in which the property is located. 537 (b)1.âIn a proceeding under this subsection, an aggrieved 538 or adversely affected party is entitled to the summary procedure 539 provided in s. 51.011, and the court shall advance the cause on 540 the calendar. The court shall review the evidence de novo and 541 enter written findings of fact based on the preponderance of the 542 evidence that a local government has adopted a land development 543 regulation in violation of this section. 544 2.âAn aggrieved or adversely affected party shall prevail 545 in an action filed under this subsection unless the local 546 government demonstrates to the court by clear and convincing 547 evidence that the land development regulation is: 548 a.âIn furtherance of a compelling governmental interest. 549 b.âThe least restrictive means of furthering the compelling 550 governmental interest. 551 (c)âThe court may: 552 1.âEnter a declaratory judgment as is provided by chapter 553 86. 554 2.âIssue a writ of mandamus. 555 3.âIssue an injunction to prevent a violation of this 556 section. 557 4.âRemand the matter to the land development regulation 558 commission for action consistent with the judgment. 559 560 The prevailing plaintiff is entitled to recover reasonable 561 attorney fees and costs, including reasonable appellate attorney 562 fees and costs. 563 (9)âThis section waives sovereign immunity for any local 564 government to the extent liability is created in this section. 565 (10)âThis section does not prohibit: 566 (a)âThe governing documents of a condominium association, a 567 homeownersâ association, or a cooperative adopted or approved 568 before July 1, 2026. 569 (b)âAny deed restrictions established before July 1, 2026. 570 571 However, if recorded in the official records on or after July 1, 572 2026, any such documents or restrictions are void and 573 unenforceable to the extent that they conflict with this 574 section. 575 Section 4.âSubsection (3) of section 177.071, Florida 576 Statutes, is amended to read: 577 177.071âAdministrative approval of plats or replats by 578 designated county or municipal official.â 579 (3)âThe governing body of a county or municipality shall 580 follow the application procedures established in s. 163.3254(6) 581 upon receiving a plat or replat under this part Unless the 582 applicant requests an extension of time, the administrative 583 authority shall approve, approve with conditions, or deny the 584 plat or replat submittal within the timeframe identified in the 585 written notice provided to the applicant under subsection (2). 586 If the administrative authority does not approve the plat or 587 replat, it must notify the applicant in writing of the reasons 588 for declining to approve the submittal. The written notice must 589 identify all areas of noncompliance and include specific 590 citations to each requirement the plat or replat submittal fails 591 to meet. The administrative authority, or an official, an 592 employee, an agent, or a designee of the governing body, may not 593 request or require the applicant to file a written extension of 594 time. 595 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.